Utah statutes.
67-16-5.6.   Offering donation, payment, or service to government agency in
exchange for approval -- When prohibited.
(1)  It is an offense for any person, under circumstances not amounting to a
violation of Section 76-8-103, to donate or offer to donate personal property,
money, or services to any agency on the condition that the agency or any other
agency approve any application or request for a permit, approval, or other
authorization.
(2) (a)  Subsection (1) does not apply to any donation of property, funds, or
services to an agency that is:
(i)  otherwise expressly required by statute, ordinance, or agency rule;
(ii)  mutually agreed to between the applicant and the entity issuing the
permit, approval, or other authorization;
(iii)  a condition of a consent decree, settlement agreement, or other binding
instrument entered into to resolve, in whole or in part, an actual or
threatened agency enforcement action; or
(iv)  made without condition.
(b)  The person making the donation of property, funds, or services shall
include with the donation a signed written statement certifying that the
donation is made without condition.
(c)  The agency receiving the donation shall place the signed written
statement in its files.
